Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-112.01
Poll watcher, defined.

Poll watcher means an individual appointed pursuant to section 32-961 who is legally in a polling place to observe the conduct of the election.

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 4.